Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 10
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND WELFARE

Sec.

§ 56-1001. Definitions.

Whenever used or referred to in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Board” means the board of health and welfare as created in section 56-1005, Idaho Code.

“Department” means the department of health and welfare.

“Director” means the director of the department of health and welfare.

“Isolation” means the separation of infected persons, or of persons suspected to be infected, from other persons to such places, under such conditions, and for such time as will prevent transmission of the infectious agent.

“Laboratory” means not only facilities for biological, serological, biophysical, cytological and pathological tests, but also facilities for the chemical or other examination of materials from water, air or other substances.

“Person” means any individual, association, partnership, firm, joint stock company, trust, estate, political subdivision, public or private corporation, state or federal governmental department, agency or instrumentality, or any other legal entity which is recognized by law as the subject of rights and duties.

“Public swimming pool” means an artificial structure, and its appurtenances, which contains water more than two (2) feet deep which is used or intended to be used for swimming or recreational bathing, and which is for the use of any segment of the public pursuant to a general invitation but not an invitation to a specific occasion or occasions. The term does not include a swimming pool operated solely for and in conjunction with a hotel, motel or other place of lodging, or a trailer park, apartment, condominium or any other residential facility containing multiple dwellings.

“Quarantine” means the restriction placed on the entrance to and exit from the place or premises where an infectious agent or hazardous material exists.

“State” means the state of Idaho.

“Substantive” means that which creates, defines or regulates the rights of any person or implements, interprets or prescribes law or policy, but does not include statements concerning only the internal management of the department and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the public.

§ 56-1002. Department of health and welfare — Creation — Administrative regions.

There is created and established in the state government a department of health and welfare which shall, for the purposes of section 20, article IV of the constitution of the state of Idaho, be an executive department of the state government. The executive and administrative power of this department shall be vested in the director of the department who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate.

The department shall be organized into such administrative and general services divisions as may be necessary in order to efficiently administer the department. Each division shall be headed by a division administrator who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director with the concurrence of the board.

In order to provide more effective and economical access to the state health and social services by the people of Idaho, the governor is hereby authorized to establish substate administrative regions. In the designation of these regions specific consideration shall be given to the geographic and economic convenience of the citizens included therein. Each substate administrative region shall be headed by a regional director who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director with the concurrence of the board.

§ 56-1003. Powers and duties of the director.

The director shall have the following powers and duties:

All of the powers and duties of the department of public health, the department of health, the board of health and all nonenvironmental protection duties of the department of health and welfare are hereby vested to the director of the department of health and welfare. Provided however, that oversight of the department and rulemaking and hearing functions relating to public health and licensure and certification standards shall be vested in the board of health and welfare. Except when the authority is vested in the board of health and welfare under law, the director shall have all such powers and duties as may have been or could have been exercised by his predecessors in law, including the authority to adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules, and shall be the successor in law to all contractual obligations entered into by predecessors in law. All rulemaking proceedings and hearings of the director shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

The director shall, pursuant and subject to the provisions of the Idaho Code, and the provisions of this chapter, formulate and recommend to the board rules, codes and standards, as may be necessary to deal with problems related to personal health, and licensure and certification requirements pertinent thereto, which shall, upon adoption by the board, have the force of law relating to any purpose which may be necessary and feasible for enforcing the provisions of this chapter including, but not limited to, the maintenance and protection of personal health. Any such rule or standard may be of general application throughout the state or may be limited as to times, places, circumstances or conditions in order to make due allowance for variations therein.

The director, under the rules, codes or standards adopted by him, shall have the general supervision of the promotion and protection of the life, health and mental health of the people of this state. The powers and duties of the director shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The issuance of licenses and permits as prescribed by law and by the rules of the board;

The supervision and administration of laboratories and the supervision and administration of standards of tests for environmental pollution, chemical analyses and communicable diseases. The director may require that laboratories operated by any city, county, institution, person, firm or corporation for health or environmental purposes conform to standards set by the board of health and welfare and the board of environmental quality;

The supervision and administration of a mental health program, which shall include services for the evaluation, screening, custody and treatment of the mentally ill and those persons suffering from a mental defect or mental defects, and services for the prevention of suicide;

The enforcement of minimum standards of health, safety and sanitation for all public swimming pools within the state;

The supervision and administration of the various schools, hospitals and institutions that were the responsibility of the board of health;

The supervision and administration of services dealing with the problems of alcoholism including, but not limited to, the care and rehabilitation of persons suffering from alcoholism;

The establishment of liaison with other governmental departments, agencies and boards in order to effectively assist other governmental entities with the planning for the control of or abatement of health problems. All of the rules and standards adopted by the board shall apply to state institutions;

The supervision and administration of an emergency medical service program including, but not limited to, assisting other governmental agencies and local governmental units, in providing first aid emergency medical services and for transportation of the sick and injured;

The supervision and administration of administrative units whose responsibility shall be to assist and encourage counties, cities, other governmental units, and industries in the control of and/or abatement of health problems; and

The enforcement of all laws, rules, codes and standards relating to health.

The director, when so designated by the governor, shall have the power to apply for, receive on behalf of the state, and utilize any federal aid, grants, gifts, gratuities, or moneys made available through the federal government.

The director shall have the power to enter into and make contracts and agreements with any public agencies or municipal corporations for facilities, land, and equipment when such use will have a beneficial, recreational, or therapeutic effect or be in the best interest in carrying out the duties imposed upon the department.

The director is authorized to adopt an official seal to be used on appropriate occasions, in connection with the functions of the department or the board, and such seal shall be judicially noticed. Copies of any books, records, papers and other documents in the department shall be admitted in evidence equally with the originals thereof when authenticated under such seal.

The director, under rules adopted by the board of health and welfare, shall have the power to impose and enforce orders of isolation and quarantine to protect the public from the spread of infectious or communicable diseases or from contamination from chemical or biological agents, whether naturally occurring or propagated by criminal or terrorist act.

An order of isolation or quarantine issued pursuant to this section shall be a final agency action for purposes of judicial review. However, this shall not prevent the director from reconsidering, amending or withdrawing the order. Judicial review of orders of isolation or quarantine shall be de novo. The court may affirm, reverse or modify the order and shall affirm the order if it appears by a preponderance of the evidence that the order is reasonably necessary to protect the public from a substantial and immediate danger of the spread of an infectious or communicable disease or from contamination by a chemical or biological agent.

If the director has reasonable cause to believe a chemical or biological agent has been released in an identifiable place, including a building or structure, an order of quarantine may be imposed to prevent the movement of persons into or out of that place, for a limited period of time, for the purpose of determining whether a person or persons at that place have been contaminated with a chemical or biological agent which may create a substantial and immediate danger to the public.

Any person who violates an order of isolation or quarantine shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

The director shall also have the power to enter into contracts for the expenditure of state matching funds for local purposes. This subsection will constitute the authority for public agencies or municipal corporations to enter into such contracts and expend money for the purposes delineated in such contracts.

§ 56-1004. Director — Additional powers and duties.

The director shall exercise the following powers and duties in addition to all other powers and duties inherent in the position:

Prescribe such rules as may be necessary for the administration of the department, the conduct and duties of the employees, the orderly and efficient management of department business, and the custody, use and preservation of department records, papers, books and property belonging to the state;

Employ such personnel as may be deemed necessary, prescribe their duties and fix their compensation within the limits provided by the state personnel system law;

Administer oaths for all purposes required in the discharge of his duties;

Prescribe the qualifications of all personnel of the department on a nonpartisan merit basis, in accordance with the Idaho personnel system law, provided however, that the administrators in charge of any division of the department, and the administrators in charge of the state hospital north, state hospital south, and southwest Idaho treatment center shall serve at the pleasure of the director;

Create such units, sections and subdivisions as are or may be necessary for the proper and efficient functioning of the department.

The department is empowered to acquire, by purchase, lease or exchange, any property which in the judgment of the department is needful for the operation of the facilities and programs for which it is responsible and to dispose of, by sale, lease or exchange, any property which in the judgment of the department is not needful for the operation of the same.

§ 56-1004A. Criminal history and background checks.

To assist in the protection of children and vulnerable adults, the legislature hereby authorizes the department of health and welfare to conduct criminal history and background checks of individuals who provide care or services to vulnerable adults or children and are identified in rule as being required to have a criminal history and background check.

To further assist in the protection of vulnerable adults, the department of health and welfare may:

Conduct criminal history and background checks of those seeking guardianship or conservatorship and those who reside in an incapacitated person’s proposed residence;

Make the findings of such criminal history and background checks available to visitors, guardians ad litem and evaluation committees appointed pursuant to chapter 5, title 15 or chapter 4, title 66, Idaho Code; and

Promulgate such rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Criminal history and background checks will be conducted by the department of health and welfare when:

Required or ordered by the court pursuant to chapter 5, title 15 or chapter 4, title 66, Idaho Code;

Requested by those required to undergo such checks; and

Paid for in full by those required to undergo such checks.

The criminal history and background check will be a fingerprint-based check of state and national records and may include information from the following:

Statewide criminal identification bureau;

Federal bureau of investigation (FBI);

Statewide sex offender registry;

Idaho transportation department driving records;

Adult and child protection registries;

Nurse aide registry; and

Department of health and human services office of the inspector general list of excluded individuals and entities.

The department of health and welfare shall promulgate rules to further define those individuals who are required to have a criminal history and background check and the effective date. Each individual shall complete an application, which includes a notarized signature, on forms provided by the department. The completed application authorizes the department to obtain and release information in accordance with state and federal law. The applicant must disclose all information requested, including information on past convictions, driver’s license revocations, and known adult or child protection findings. Once an application has been completed, the employer, at its discretion, may allow the individual to provide care or services prior to the individual completing fingerprinting and pending completion of the criminal history and background check by the department. The department shall promulgate rules defining the time frame for submitting the application. Under no circumstances may the individual be allowed to provide care or services where the employer has reviewed the completed application and the individual has disclosed a designated crime as set forth in rule.

The department shall review the information received from the criminal history and background check and determine whether the applicant has a criminal or other relevant record that would disqualify the individual. The department shall determine which crimes disqualify the applicant and for what period of time according to promulgated rules. The process for the check and the issuance of a clearance or denial is set forth in department rules. The applicant shall be provided an opportunity for a formal review of a denial. The department shall communicate clearance or denial to the applicant and the applicant’s employer.

Applicants are responsible for the cost of the criminal history and background check except where otherwise provided by department rules.

The department, or an employer of an applicant, who acts in reasonable reliance on the results of the criminal history and background check in making an employment decision, is immune from liability for that decision when it is based on such results.

The department, its officers and employees are immune from liability for the consequences of including or excluding classes of individuals in the criminal history and background check process.

Clearance through the criminal history and background check process is not a determination of suitability for employment.

The provisions of subsection (6) of this section shall not apply to criminal history and background checks conducted pursuant to this subsection.

§ 56-1005. Board — Composition — Officers — Compensation — Powers — Subpoena — Depositions — Review — Rules.

The board of health and welfare shall consist of eleven (11) members, seven (7) members of which shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. The members appointed by the governor may be removed by the governor for cause. Each member of the board appointed by the governor shall be a citizen of the United States, a resident of the state of Idaho, and a qualified elector. Not more than four (4) members of the board appointed by the governor shall be from any one (1) political party. Of the members of the board appointed by the governor, four (4) members shall be chosen with due regard to their knowledge and interest in health and social services, two (2) members shall be chosen based on their experience in business or finance, and one (1) member shall be selected as a representative of the public at large. The voting members shall be appointed to assure appropriate geographic representation of the state of Idaho. The other four (4) members of the board, who shall be nonvoting members, shall be:

The chairperson of the senate health and welfare committee, or the chair’s designee;

The chairperson of the house of representatives health and welfare committee, or the chair’s designee;

The director of the department of health and welfare, who shall serve as the board’s secretary; and

A representative of the office of the governor, as designated by the governor.

The members of the board of health and welfare appointed by the governor, serving on the effective date of this act shall continue in office as members of the board of health and welfare. All members of the board of health and welfare appointed by the governor shall serve four (4) year terms.

The voting members of the board annually shall elect a chairman and a vice chairman, who shall be voting members of the board. The board shall hold meetings no less than once every quarter. Special meetings of the board may be called by the chairman of the board, by a majority of the voting members of the board or, on written request, by the director of the department of health and welfare. A majority of the voting members shall be necessary to constitute a quorum at any regular or special meeting and the action of the majority of members present shall be the action of the board. The members of the board shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(p), Idaho Code.

The board, in furtherance of its duties under law and under its rules, shall have the power to administer oaths, certify to official acts, and to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents and testimony. The board may, if a witness refuses to attend or testify, or to produce any papers required by such subpoenas, report to the district court in and for the county in which the proceeding is pending, by petition, setting forth that due notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of said witnesses, or the production of said papers, that the witness has been properly summoned, and that the witness has failed and refused to attend or produce the papers required by this subpoena before the board, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him in the course of said proceedings, and ask an order of said court compelling the witness to attend and testify and produce said papers before the board. The court, upon the petition of the board, shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place to be fixed by the court in such order, the time to be not more than ten (10) days from the date of the order, and then and there shall show cause why he has not attended and testified or produced said papers before the board. A copy of said order shall be served upon said witness. If it shall appear to the court that said subpoena was regularly issued by the board and regularly served, the court shall thereupon order that said witness appear before the board at the time and place fixed in said order, and testify or produce the required papers. Upon failure to obey said order, said witness shall be dealt with for contempt of court.

The director, his designee, or any party to the action may, in an investigation or hearing before the board, cause the deposition or interrogatory of witnesses or parties residing within or without the state, to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions and interrogatories in civil actions in the district court of this state, and to that end may compel the attendance of said witnesses and production of books, documents, papers and accounts.

Any person aggrieved by an action or inaction of the department of health and welfare shall be afforded an opportunity for a fair hearing upon request therefor in writing pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and the rules promulgated thereunder. In those cases where the board has been granted the authority to hold such a hearing pursuant to a provision of the Idaho Code, the hearing may be conducted by the board at a regular or special meeting, or the board may designate hearing officers, who shall have the power and authority to conduct hearings in the name of the board at any time and place. In any hearing, a member of the board or hearing officer designated by it, shall have the power to administer oaths, examine witnesses, and issue in the name of the board subpoenas requiring the testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence relevant to any matter in the hearing.

Any person adversely affected by a final determination of the board, may secure judicial review by filing a petition for review as prescribed under the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The petition for review shall be served upon the chairman of the board, the director of the department, and upon the attorney general of the state of Idaho. Such service shall be jurisdictional and the provisions of this section shall be the exclusive procedure for appeal.

The board, by the affirmative vote of four (4) of its voting members, may adopt, amend or repeal the rules, codes, and standards of the department, that are necessary and feasible in order to carry out its duties and responsibilities and to enforce the laws of this state.

All rulemaking proceedings and hearings of the board shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

In addition to any other powers and duties granted to the board under law, the board shall:

Advise the director and the governor on department fiscal, policy and administrative matters;

Review and advise the director regarding the department’s strategic plan and performance measures;

Develop goals and standards to measure department efficiency and effectiveness; and
(d) Review and advise the director and the governor on department initiatives.

The board shall provide an annual report to the governor and to the legislature prior to the start of each legislative session, addressing:

The key department fiscal and policy issues;

The department’s managerial and overall performance; and

The major proposed and ongoing departmental initiatives.

The rules and orders so adopted and established shall have the force and effect of law and may deal with any matters deemed necessary and feasible for protecting the health of the state.

§ 56-1006. Title superseded.

Except with respect to environmental protection functions, wherever the words “board of health” appear in the Idaho Code, they shall mean the board of health and welfare, and wherever the words “administrator of health” appear in the Idaho Code, they shall mean the director of the department of health and welfare, and wherever the words “department of health” appear in the Idaho Code, they shall mean the department of health and welfare.

§ 56-1007. Collection of fees for services.

The department of health and welfare is hereby authorized to charge and collect reasonable fees, established by rule, for any service rendered by the department. The fee may be determined by a sliding scale according to income or available assets. The department is hereby authorized to require information concerning the total income and assets of each person receiving services in order to determine the amount of the fee to be charged.

§ 56-1008. Criminal violation — Penalty.

Any person who willfully or negligently violates any of the provisions of the public health laws or the terms of any lawful notice, order, permit, standard, or rule issued pursuant thereto, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

§ 56-1009. Investigation — Inspection — Right of entry — Violation — Enforcement — Penalty — Injunctions.

The director shall cause investigations to be made upon receipt of information concerning an alleged violation of this chapter or of any rule, permit or order promulgated thereunder, and may cause to be made such other investigations as the director shall deem advisable.

For the purpose of enforcing any provision of this chapter or any rule authorized in this chapter, the director or the director’s designee shall have the authority to:

Conduct a program of continuing surveillance and of regular or periodic inspection of actual or potential health hazards;

Enter at all reasonable times upon any private or public property, upon presentation of appropriate credentials, for the purpose of inspecting or investigating to ascertain possible violations of this chapter or of rules, permits or orders adopted and promulgated by the director or the board;

All inspections and investigations conducted under the authority of this chapter shall be performed in conformity with the prohibitions against unreasonable searches and seizures contained in the fourth amendment to the constitution of the United States and section 17, article I, of the constitution of the state of Idaho. The state shall not, under the authority granted by this chapter, conduct warrantless searches of private property in the absence of either consent from the property owner or occupier or exigent circumstances such as a public health emergency;

Any district court in and for the county in which the subject property is located is authorized to issue a search warrant to the director upon a showing of (i) probable cause to suspect a violation, or (ii) the existence of a reasonable program of inspection. Any search warrant issued under the authority of this chapter shall be limited in scope to the specific purposes for which it is issued and shall state with specificity the manner and the scope of the search authorized.

Whenever the director determines that any person is in violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule, permit or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter, the director may commence either of the following:

Administrative enforcement action.

Notice. The director may commence an administrative enforcement action by issuing a written notice of violation. The notice of violation shall identify the alleged violation with specificity, shall specify each provision of the chapter, rule, regulation, permit or order which has been violated, and shall state the amount of civil penalty claimed for each violation. The notice of violation shall inform the person to whom it is directed of an opportunity to confer with the director or the director’s designee in a compliance conference concerning the alleged violation. A written response may be required within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the notice of violation by the person to whom it is directed.

Scheduling compliance conference. If a recipient of a notice of violation contacts the department within fifteen (15) days of the receipt of the notice, the recipient shall be entitled to a compliance conference. The conference shall be held within twenty (20) days of the date of receipt of the notice, unless a later date is agreed upon between the parties. If a compliance conference is not requested, the director may proceed with a civil enforcement action as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(iii) Compliance conference. The compliance conference shall provide an opportunity for the recipient of a notice of violation to explain the circumstances of the alleged violation and, where appropriate, to present a proposal for remedying damage caused by the alleged violation and assuring future compliance.

Consent order. If the recipient and the director agree on a plan to remedy damage caused by the alleged violation and to assure future compliance, they may enter into a consent order formalizing their agreement. The consent order may include a provision providing for payment of any agreed civil penalty.

Effect of consent order. A consent order shall be effective immediately upon signing by both parties and shall preclude any civil enforcement action for the same alleged violation. If a party does not comply with the terms of the consent order, the director may seek and obtain, in any appropriate district court, specific performance of the consent order and such other relief as authorized in this chapter.

Failure to reach consent order. If the parties cannot reach agreement on a consent order within sixty (60) days after the receipt of the notice of violation or if the recipient does not request a compliance conference pursuant to paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, the director may commence and prosecute a civil enforcement action in district court, in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

Civil enforcement action. The director may initiate a civil enforcement action through the attorney general as provided in section 56-1010, Idaho Code. Civil enforcement actions shall be commenced and prosecuted in the district court in and for the county in which the alleged violation occurred, and may be brought against any person who is alleged to have violated any provision of this chapter or any rule, permit or order which has become effective pursuant to this chapter. Such action may be brought to compel compliance with any provision of this chapter or with any rule, permit or order promulgated hereunder and for any relief or remedies authorized in this chapter. The director shall not be required to initiate or prosecute an administrative action before initiating a civil enforcement action.

No civil or administrative proceeding may be brought to recover for a violation of any provision of this chapter or a violation of any rule, permit or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter, more than two (2) years after the director had knowledge or ought reasonably to have had knowledge of the violation.

Monetary penalties.

Any person determined in a civil enforcement action to have violated any provision of this chapter or any rule, permit or order promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation or one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day of a continuing violation, whichever is greater. The method of recovery of said penalty shall be by a civil enforcement action in the district court in and for the county where the violation occurred. All civil penalties collected under this chapter shall be paid into the general fund of the state. Parties to an administrative enforcement action may agree to a civil penalty as provided in this subsection.

The imposition or computation of monetary penalties may take into account the seriousness of the violation and any good faith efforts by the person to comply with the law.

In addition to such civil penalties, any person who has been determined to have violated the provisions of this chapter or the rules, permits or orders promulgated thereunder, shall be liable for any expense incurred by the state in enforcing the chapter, or in enforcing or terminating any nuisance, cause of sickness or health hazard.

No action taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or of any other health law shall relieve any person from any civil action and damages that may exist for injury or damage resulting from any violation of this chapter or of the rules, permits and orders promulgated thereunder.

In addition to, and notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, in circumstances of emergency creating conditions of imminent and substantial danger to the public health, the prosecuting attorney or the attorney general may institute a civil action for an immediate injunction to halt any activity in violation of the provisions of this chapter or rules, permits and orders promulgated thereunder. In such action the court may issue an ex parte restraining order.

§ 56-1010. Commencement of civil enforcement actions — Criminal actions authorized — Duties of attorney general.

Upon request of the director, it shall be the duty of the attorney general to institute and prosecute civil enforcement actions or injunctive actions as provided in section 56-1009, Idaho Code, and to prosecute actions or proceedings for the enforcement of any criminal provisions of this chapter. In addition, when deemed by the director to be necessary, the director may retain or employ private counsel. The attorney general may delegate the authority and duty under this section to prosecute criminal actions to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which such a criminal action may arise.

§ 56-1011. Emergency medical services — Statement of intent.

It is the purpose of the legislature of the state of Idaho in the adoption of sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, to recognize the importance of the delivery of emergency medical services and to provide reasonable regulation of the same. For this purpose, the provisions of section 54-1804, Idaho Code, shall not be so construed as to prohibit or penalize emergency medical services rendered by a person authorized to render emergency medical services by sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, if such emergency medical service is rendered under the responsible supervision and control of a licensed physician.